Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-262
Distributions of assets.

Distributions of cash or other assets of a limited partnership shall be allocated among the partners, and among classes or groups of partners, in the manner provided in the partnership agreement. If the partnership agreement does not so provide, distributions shall be made on the basis of the agreed value, as stated in the records of the limited partnership, of the contributions made by each partner to the extent they have been received by the limited partnership and have not been returned.

Laws 1981, LB 272, § 30;

Laws 1989, LB 482, § 36.